Massachusetts, session 194th, S2494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as amended by section 72 of Chapter 178
of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the words “the dental assistance benefit shall
include, but not be limited to, coverage for the cost of those necessary medical visits, procedures,
prescriptions and other such treatments as the secretary shall determine through regulations. The
secretary shall, by regulation or otherwise, make provision to keep the program efficient and
economical.” And inserting in place thereof, the following:-
The dental assistance benefit shall include, but not be limited to, coverage for the cost of
those necessary medical visits, procedures, prescriptions, dental insurance, and other such
treatments as the secretary shall determine through regulations. The secretary shall, by regulation
or otherwise, make provision to keep the program efficient and economical.
of 1